Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 1 MAIL BALLOT ELECTIONS
1-7.5-107.2. Manner of early voting - securing ballots cast during early voting.

An eligible elector who receives a mail ballot may cast the ballot at a voter service and polling center prior to election day. Ballot boxes must be locked and sealed each night with a numbered seal under the supervision of the election judges or watchers, and the designated election official shall retain possession of the keys until he or she transfers the same to the counting place pursuant to section 1-7.5-203 for preparation to count and tabulate. When a seal is broken, the designated election official and a person who is not of the same political party as the designated election official shall record the number of the seal and maintain the seal along with an explanation of the reasons for breaking the seal.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), the voting machines, electronic voting machines, or ballot boxes must remain locked and secured with a numbered seal, and the tabulation of the votes cast must remain unknown until the time prescribed in section 1-7.5-202 for counting voters' ballots. Alternatively, except for electronic voting equipment and mail ballot boxes, the ballot boxes must be opened each night, and the voted ballots must be placed in a transfer case that is locked and secured with a numbered seal. A record must be maintained consisting of the date and seal number of each ballot box and transfer case until each ballot box and transfer case is transferred pursuant to section 1-7.5-203 for preparation for counting and tabulating. When a seal is broken, the designated election official and a person who is not of the same political party as the designated election official shall record the number of the seal and maintain the seal along with an explanation of the reasons for breaking the seal. During the time the voter service and polling center is not open, the designated election official shall have the custody and keys of any voting machine or electronic voting equipment being used for the casting of ballots.

The designated election official shall place in a locked and secured location all direct record electronic voting machine cartridges that record votes cast on such voting machines. The tabulation of votes cast and recorded on such cartridges must remain unknown until the time prescribed in section 1-7.5-202 for counting ballots.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 732, § 87, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was added by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7.5-107.3. Verification of signatures - rules.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, in every mail ballot election that is coordinated with or conducted by the county clerk and recorder, an election judge shall compare the signature on the self-affirmation on each return envelope with the signature of the eligible elector stored in the statewide voter registration system in accordance with subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 356, 2, effective April 10, 2008.)

(1.5) (a) If an eligible elector returns a ballot but does not have a signature stored in the statewide voter registration system, the county clerk and recorder shall, within three days after the missing signature is confirmed, but in no event later than two days after election day, send to the eligible elector at the address indicated in the registration records and to the eligible elector's electronic mail address if available a letter explaining the need for a signature for verification purposes and a form with instructions for the eligible elector to:

Confirm that the eligible elector returned a ballot to the county clerk and recorder;

Provide a copy of the eligible elector's identification as defined in section

1-1-104

(19.5); and

Provide a signature for verification in accordance with this section.

If the county clerk and recorder receives the form within eight days after election day confirming that the eligible elector returned a ballot to the county clerk and recorder and enclosing a copy of the eligible elector's identification as defined in section

1-1-104

(19.5), and if the ballot is otherwise valid, the ballot shall be counted. If the eligible elector returns the form indicating that the eligible elector did not return a ballot to the county clerk and recorder, or if the eligible elector does not return the form within eight days after election day or does not enclose identification, the ballot shall not be counted.

An original return envelope containing a voted ballot that is not counted in accordance with subsection (1.5)(b) of this section shall be stored under seal as an election record in the office of the county clerk and recorder in a secure location separate from valid return envelopes and may be removed only under the authority of the district attorney or by order of a court having jurisdiction.

If, upon comparing the signature of an eligible elector on the self-affirmation on the return envelope with the signature of the eligible elector stored in the statewide voter registration system, the election judge determines that the signatures do not match, or if a signature verification device used pursuant to subsection (5) of this section is unable to determine that the signatures match, two other election judges of different political party affiliations shall simultaneously compare the signatures. If both other election judges agree that the signatures do not match, the county clerk and recorder shall, within three days after the signature deficiency has been confirmed, but in no event later than two days after election day, send to the eligible elector at the address indicated in the registration records and to the eligible elector's electronic mail address if available a letter explaining the discrepancy in signatures and a form for the eligible elector to confirm that the elector returned a ballot to the county clerk and recorder. If the county clerk and recorder receives the form within eight days after election day confirming that the elector returned a ballot to the county clerk and recorder and enclosing a copy of the elector's identification as defined in section 1-1-104 (19.5), and if the ballot is otherwise valid, the ballot shall be counted. If the eligible elector returns the form indicating that the elector did not return a ballot to the county clerk and recorder, or if the eligible elector does not return the form within eight days after election day, the self-affirmation on the return envelope shall be categorized as incorrect, the ballot shall not be counted, and the county clerk and recorder shall send copies of the eligible elector's signature on the return envelope and the signature stored in the statewide voter registration system to the district attorney for investigation.

An original return envelope containing a voted ballot that is not counted in accordance with subsection (2)(a) of this section shall be stored under seal in the office of the county clerk and recorder in a secure location separate from valid return envelopes and may be removed only under the authority of the district attorney or by order of a court having jurisdiction.

In the case of a disagreement among the election judges as to whether the signature of an eligible elector on the self-affirmation on the return envelope matches the signature of the eligible elector stored in the statewide voter registration system pursuant to the procedures specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the signatures are deemed to match, and the election judge shall follow the procedures specified in section 1-7.5-107 (6) concerning the qualification and counting of mail ballots.

If the election judge determines that the signature of an eligible elector on the self-affirmation matches the elector's signature stored in the statewide voter registration system, the election judge shall follow the procedures specified in section 1-7.5-107 (6) concerning the qualification and counting of mail ballots.

An election judge shall not determine that the signature of an eligible elector on the self-affirmation does not match the signature of that eligible elector stored in the statewide voter registration system solely on the basis of substitution of initials or use of a common nickname.

The county clerk and recorder shall provide training in the technique and standards of signature comparison to election judges who compare signatures pursuant to this section.

A county clerk and recorder may allow an election judge to use a signature verification device to compare the signature on the self-affirmation on a return envelope of an eligible elector's ballot with the signature of the elector stored in the statewide voter registration system in accordance with this subsection (5) and any rules promulgated by the secretary of state pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.

If a signature verification device determines that the signature on the self-affirmation on a return envelope of an eligible elector's ballot matches the signature of the elector stored in the statewide voter registration system, the signature on the self-affirmation is deemed verified, and the election judge shall follow the procedures specified in section 1-7.5-107 (6) concerning the qualification and counting of mail ballots. If a signature verification device is unable to determine that the signature on the self-affirmation on a return envelope of an eligible elector's mail ballot matches the signature of the elector stored in the statewide voter registration system, an election judge shall compare the signatures in accordance with subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section.

(5.5) The county clerk and recorder shall ensure the privacy of each elector's vote when election judges are removing and separating marked ballots from return envelopes. If the county clerk and recorder chooses not to include a secrecy envelope or sleeve in the mail ballot packet, he or she must notify the secretary of state in the election plan required under section 1-7.5-105 (1) and must also explain the county's process for ensuring the privacy of marked ballots. The secretary of state shall promulgate rules to ensure the privacy of each elector's vote.

The secretary of state shall adopt rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., establishing procedures for using signature verification devices to process ballots used in mail ballot elections pursuant to this article.

Each county clerk and recorder shall, as soon as practical, develop and implement options for electors to electronically provide necessary documentation for signature verification.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1280, § 7, effective April 22; entire section added, p. 1438, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2004:

(2)(c) amended, p. 1186, § 3, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1411, § 29, effective June 6; (2)(a) amended, p. 1446, § 29, effective June 6.

L. 2008:

(1), (2)(a), (2)(c), (3), and (4)(a) amended and (5) added, p. 356, § 2, effective April 10.

L. 2009:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 09-1337), ch. 262, p. 1201, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 835, § 21, effective May 5.

L. 2013:

(4)(b) and (5)(a) amended and (6) added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 733, § 88, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

(4)(b) amended, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 564, § 18, effective May 9.

L. 2018:

(2)(b) amended and (5.5) added, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1613, § 29, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3033, § 42, effective August 2; (1.5) and (7) added, (SB 19-235), ch. 329, p. 3055, § 7, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by House Bill 03-1241 and Senate Bill 03-102 were harmonized.

Cross references:

(1) In 2013, subsections (4)(b) and (5)(a) were amended and subsection (6) was added by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(2) For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-7.5-107.5. Counting mail ballots.

The election officials at the mail ballot counting place may receive and prepare mail ballots delivered and turned over to them by the designated election official for tabulation. Counting of the mail ballots may begin fifteen days prior to the election and continue until counting is completed. The election official in charge of the mail ballot counting place shall take all precautions necessary to ensure the secrecy of the counting procedures, and no information concerning the count shall be released by the election officials or watchers until after 7 p.m. on election day.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 777, § 59, effective May 20.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1336), ch. 261, p. 1198, § 6, effective August 5.

1-7.5-108. Mail-in ballots. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 757, § 10, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1779, § 18, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7.5-108.5. Designation of inactive status in connection with mailing of mail ballots.

In connection with any election conducted on or after May 10, 2013, if a mail ballot sent to a registered elector is returned by the United States postal service as undeliverable, the county clerk and recorder shall mark the registration record of that elector with the word "Inactive". The clerk and recorder shall mail a confirmation card pursuant to section 1-2-605 to any elector whose ballot was returned by the United States postal service as undeliverable.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1742, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 733, § 89, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7.5-109. Write-in candidates.

A write-in candidate is allowed in mail ballot elections if the candidate has filed an affidavit of intent with the designated election official pursuant to section 1-4-1101. Ballots for write-in candidates are counted pursuant to section 1-7.5-206.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 757, § 10, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 734, § 90, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7.5-110. Challenges.

Votes cast pursuant to this article may be challenged pursuant to and in accordance with law. Any mail ballot election held pursuant to this article shall not be invalidated on the grounds that an eligible elector did not receive a ballot so long as the designated election official for the political subdivision conducting the election acted in good faith in complying with the provisions of this article or with rules promulgated by the secretary of state.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 757, § 10, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7.5-109 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-7.5-111. Report to the general assembly. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 757, § 10, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1269, § 192, effective August 7.

1-7.5-112. Repeal of article. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 757, § 10, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 1167, § 42, effective July 1.

1-7.5-113. Voting at group residential facilities.

If a group residential facility does not have mail boxes in which a representative of the United States postal service may directly deposit mail, and more than seven mail ballots are to be sent to that group residential facility, a committee consisting of one employee of the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the facility is located and, where available, a representative appointed by each of the major political parties shall deliver the mail ballots and return the voted ballots to the office of the county clerk and recorder. The delivery of ballots under this section may begin on the forty-fifth day before election day.

For nonpartisan elections, including independent mail ballot elections conducted pursuant to part 11 of article 13.5 of this title, the designated election official shall appoint a committee that consists of two or more election judges or employees or representatives of the designated election official. The voted ballots must be returned to the office of the designated election official.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 734, § 91, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 72, § 37, effective February 18.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1650, § 39, effective June 21.

Cross references:

(1) In 2013, this section was added by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

1-7.5-113.5. Voting at county jails or detention centers.

Each county clerk and recorder shall make efforts to coordinate with the county sheriff or the county sheriff's designee at each county jail or detention center to facilitate voting for all confined eligible electors.

The election plan required by section 1-7.5-105 must include the following information:

How the county clerk and recorder will provide each county jail or detention center with voter information materials consistent with the materials provided to nonconfined eligible electors, including at a minimum a list of acceptable forms of identification under section 1-1-104 (19.5) and the information required by sections 1-40-124.5 and 1-40-125; and

The process by which the county clerk and the sheriff or the sheriff's designee will facilitate voter registration and delivery and retrieval of mail ballots for confined eligible electors.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1650, § 40, effective June 21.

1-7.5-114. Watchers at voter service and polling centers.

Any political party, candidate, proponents, or opponents of a ballot issue entitled to have watchers at voter service and polling centers each has the right to maintain one watcher in the office of the designated election official and each voter service and polling center during the period in which mail ballots may be applied for or received.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 734, § 91, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was added by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7.5-114.5. Replacement ballots - ballots for new electors - ballots for electors who updated their records.

An eligible elector may obtain a replacement ballot if the ballot that was originally mailed to the elector was destroyed, spoiled, lost, or for some other reason not received by the elector. To obtain a replacement ballot by mail, the elector shall make a request to the county clerk and recorder for a replacement ballot no later than the eighth day before an election. The county clerk shall not mail a replacement ballot to the elector making the request if the clerk has already received a ballot for that election from the elector making the request.

Commencing on the fifteenth day before the election, the county clerk and recorder shall deliver any ballot that must be sent by mail to the United States postal service within two business days after processing a registration application or an update to a voter registration record that requires a new ballot to be sent to an elector.

Commencing on the eleventh day before the election, the county clerk and recorder shall mail all mail ballots to electors by first class mail.

Commencing on the eighth day before an election, the county clerk and recorder shall deliver to the United States postal service any ballot that must be sent by mail within two business days after receiving a registration application or an update to a voter registration record that results in the issuance of an original or a replacement mail ballot to an elector.

Any county clerk who receives information from the United States postal service or any other third party indicating that ballots have been lost, stolen, or will, for any reason, not be timely delivered to electors, shall report the issue to the secretary of state.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1313), ch. 260, p. 1255, § 3, effective September 14.

1-7.5-115. Emergency voting - replacement ballots - electronic transfer - rules - definition.

If an eligible elector or a member of an eligible elector's immediate family, related to the second degree by blood, adoption, marriage, or civil union partnership, is confined in a hospital or place of residence on election day, or if, due to emergency conditions such as natural disasters arising after the deadlines by which ballots are mailed, the elector is unable to vote in person, the elector may request in a personally signed written statement that the county clerk and recorder or designated election official send a replacement ballot. The county clerk and recorder or designated election official shall provide the replacement ballot, at the office of the county clerk and recorder or designated election official during the office's regular hours of business, to any authorized representative of the elector.

For the purposes of this paragraph (a), "authorized representative" means a person who possesses a written statement from the elector containing the elector's signature, name, and address of residence and indicating that the elector is unable to vote in person after the last day to mail a ballot and requesting that the replacement ballot be given to the authorized person as identified by name and address of residence.

A request for a replacement ballot under this section shall be made before 5 p.m. on the day of the election, and the ballot must be returned no later than 7 p.m. on the day of the election.

If the eligible elector is unable to have an authorized representative pick up the ballot at the office of the county clerk and recorder or designated election official and deliver it to the eligible elector, the designated election official shall deliver a replacement ballot to the eligible elector by electronic transfer in accordance with the rules of the secretary of state. If the replacement ballot is delivered to the eligible elector by electronic transfer, the eligible elector may return the ballot by electronic transfer as set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, after marking the replacement ballot, the eligible elector shall place it in a return envelope provided by the county clerk and recorder or designated election official. The elector shall then fill out and sign the self-affirmation on the envelope, as provided in section 1-7.5-107, on or before election day and return it to the office of the county clerk and recorder or designated election official. Upon receipt of the envelope, the county clerk and recorder or designated election official shall verify the elector's name on the return envelope and shall deposit the envelope in the office in a ballot box that is locked and secured with a numbered seal.

If, following the procedure set forth in this section, the county clerk and recorder or designated election official is unable to provide a replacement ballot to an elector, the county clerk and recorder or designated election official shall provide a replacement ballot to the elector by electronic transfer in accordance with the election rules of the secretary of state. If the replacement ballot is delivered to the eligible elector by electronic transfer, the eligible elector may return the ballot by electronic transfer as set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

If a replacement ballot is delivered to an eligible elector by electronic transfer pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section or subsection (3) of this section, the eligible elector may return the voted ballot to the county clerk and recorder or designated election official by electronic transfer. In order to be counted, the returned ballot must be received in the office of the county clerk and recorder or designated election official by 7 p.m. on election day. Once the ballot is received, a bipartisan team of judges shall duplicate the ballot, and the ballot shall be counted in the same manner as all other mail ballots. Such judges shall not reveal how the elector has cast his or her ballot.

Any elector who receives a replacement ballot by electronic transfer pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section or subsection (3) of this section shall be informed in the instructions for completing the ballot that, if the ballot is returned by electronic transfer, the ballot will not be a confidential ballot.

In handling a returned replacement ballot pursuant to this subsection (4), all reasonable means shall be taken to ensure that only the judges are aware of information connecting the elector to the returned ballot.

The secretary of state may prescribe by rule any procedures or requirements as may be necessary to implement this subsection (4). The rules must be promulgated in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 734, § 91, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 564, § 19, effective May 9.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was added by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7.5-116. Applications for absentee ballot. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 734, § 91, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 73, § 38, effective February 18.

Initiated 2016:

(1)(b) amended, Proposition 108, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 27, 2016. See L. 2017, p. 2826.

L. 2018:

Entire section repealed, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1613, § 30, effective May 29.